Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.760

Computation of the retirement allowance.

A member of the retirement system shall receive a retirement allowance equal to two percent of such member's average final compensation for each year of service.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 293 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—Legislative direction and placement—Section headings—1977 ex.s. c 293: See notes following RCW 41.32.755.